Virginia statutes. Title 3.2. Agriculture, Animal Care, and Food.
Article 3. Seed Potato Standards.

§ 3.2-1816.
Standards required of seed potatoes.

Any seed potatoes sold, offered for sale, advertised, or shipped in the Commonwealth shall conform to the standards of approved seed potatoes.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-228.4; 1950, p. 1029; 1958, c. 94; 1966, cc. 686, 702, § 3.1-288; 2008, c. 860, § 3.2-4105; 2012, cc. 803, 835.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, enactments 22 through 26, eliminated the Seed Potato Board and incorporates its duties and responsibilities into the Potato Board. The historical reference to former section 3.2-4105, has been transferred to this section.

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 24 provides: “That all regulations, rules, and standards adopted by the Seed Potato Board pursuant to Chapter 41 (§

3.2-4100

et seq.) of Title 3.2 of the Code of Virginia that are in effect as of July 1, 2012, shall be administered by the Potato Board and shall remain in full force and effect until the Potato Board adopts regulations pursuant to the 22nd enactment of this act.”

§ 3.2-1817.
Exempted sales.

Nothing in this article shall prohibit the sale of seed potatoes sold by the grower to a planter who has personal knowledge of the conditions under which the seed potatoes were grown.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-228.10; 1950, p. 1030; 1958, c. 94; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-294; 2008, c. 860, § 3.2-4106; 2012, cc. 803, 835.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, enactments 22 through 26, eliminated the Seed Potato Board and incorporates its duties and responsibilities into the Potato Board. The historical reference to former section 3.2-4106, has been transferred to this section.

§ 3.2-1818.
Inspection of potatoes; right of entry; fees; records required.

The Commissioner shall inspect any seed potatoes. The Commissioner may enter any place of business, warehouse, common carrier, or other place where seed potatoes may be found for the purpose of an inspection. It is unlawful for any person to interfere with such inspections.

The fee for inspection shall not exceed the lesser of the current rate for federal-state inspection of table stock potatoes or the reasonable cost of inspection. The Commissioner shall abate any fee to the extent funds are appropriated from the general fund for seed potato inspection.

Bills of lading, invoices, or other records accompanying any shipment of approved seed potatoes shall give the name of the consignee, consignor, and custodian, if any. The Commissioner shall have the right to inspect such records.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-228.8; 1950, p. 1030; 1966, cc. 686, 702, § 3.1-292; 1978, c. 540; 1980, c. 308; 2008, c. 860, § 3.2-4107; 2012, cc. 803, 835.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, enactments 22 through 26, eliminated the Seed Potato Board and incorporates its duties and responsibilities into the Potato Board. The historical reference to former section 3.2-4107, has been transferred to this section.

§ 3.2-1819.
“Stop sale” order; seizure; condemnation.

When the Commissioner finds seed potatoes sold or offered for sale in violation of this article or any regulation hereunder, he may issue a “stop sale” order to the owner or custodian. It is unlawful for anyone to sell any seed potatoes under a “stop sale” order until the Commissioner has evidence that such potatoes will (i) not be used for propagation purposes or (ii) be used outside the Commonwealth. When the Commissioner has such evidence, he shall issue a notice releasing potatoes from the “stop sale” order.

Any shipment of seed potatoes in violation of this article shall be subject to seizure on complaint of the Commissioner to the appropriate court in the county or city where the seed potatoes are located. If the court finds the seed potatoes to be in violation and orders condemnation, the owner shall be permitted to post a bond for double the amount of the value of the seed potatoes. Then the owner shall have 10 days from the date of the order of condemnation to denature, destroy, or process the potatoes for other than propagation purposes. If the owner fails to post the bond required or act within the time limit set forth in this subsection, then the court shall order that the seed potatoes be denatured, destroyed, or processed for other than propagation purposes.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-228.8; 1950, p. 1030; 1966, cc. 686, 702, § 3.1-292; 1978, c. 540; 1980, c. 308; 2008, c. 860, § 3.2-4108; 2012, cc. 803, 835.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, enactments 22 through 26, eliminated the Seed Potato Board and incorporates its duties and responsibilities into the Potato Board. The historical reference to former section 3.2-4108, has been transferred to this section.

§ 3.2-1820.
Commissioner may permit sale of substandard potatoes and experimental varieties.

The Commissioner may permit the sale of seed potatoes that do not meet the standards of approved seed potatoes when he deems necessary. The Commissioner may permit the sale of experimental varieties of potatoes for propagation purposes. He may delegate the authority granted in this section to the Board.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-228.9; 1950, p. 1030; 1966, cc. 686, 702, § 3.1-293; 2008, c. 860, § 3.2-4109; 2012, cc. 803, 835.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, enactments 22 through 26, eliminated the Seed Potato Board and incorporates its duties and responsibilities into the Potato Board. The historical reference to former section 3.2-4109, has been transferred to this section.

§ 3.2-1821.
Notice; hearings.

If the Commissioner finds a violation of this article or of any regulation adopted pursuant to this article, he shall notify the custodian of the seed potatoes in writing, designating a time and place for a hearing, and send a copy of the notice to the owner or shipper. Any party notified shall be given an opportunity to be heard under the regulations adopted pursuant to this article. If it appears after proper hearing that any of the provisions of this article have been violated, the Commissioner may certify the facts to the attorney for the Commonwealth in the county or city where the violation occurred and furnish him with a copy of the results of the inspection duly authenticated and under the oath of the inspector.

It shall be the duty of each attorney for the Commonwealth with responsibility for the enforcement of this article, and to whom any violation is reported, to commence proceedings in the appropriate court.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-228.11; 1950, p. 1030; 1966, cc. 686, 702, § 3.1-295; 1978, c. 540; 2008, c. 860; § 3.2-4110; 2012, cc. 803, 835.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, enactments 22 through 26, eliminated the Seed Potato Board and incorporates its duties and responsibilities into the Potato Board. The historical reference to former section 3.2-4110, has been transferred to this section.

§ 3.2-1822.
Penalties.

Any person violating any provision of this article or any regulation adopted pursuant to this article is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-228.11; 1950, p. 1030; 1966, cc. 686, 702, § 3.1-295; 1978, c. 540; 2008, c. 860, § 3.2-4111; 2012, cc. 803, 835.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, enactments 22 through 26, eliminated the Seed Potato Board and incorporates its duties and responsibilities into the Potato Board. The historical reference to former section 3.2-4111, has been transferred to this section.